Alabama, session 2026rs, SB86.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
13 Section 1. Sections 40-17-168.5, 40-17-335, and
14 40-17-353, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
15 follows:
16 "§40-17-168.5
17 (a) Upon approval of the application by the department,
18 the applicant must file with the department a surety bond. The
19 bond amount for an applicant for a license as a public seller
20 of CNG/LNG or a fleet producer of CNG/LNG shall be a minimum
21 of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or in the
22 approximate amount of twice the average monthly tax liability,
23 whichever is greater.
24 (b) The department shall review the bond amounts every
25 five years beginning January 2023 to ensure that each public
26 seller of CNG/LNG and each fleet producer of CNG/LNG has
27 posted a surety bond sufficient to cover twice the average
28 monthly tax liability as referenced in subdivision (a). Based
Page 1

monthly tax liability as referenced in subdivision (a). Based
SB86 Enrolled
29 upon this review, or if at any time that the department
30 determines that the bond amount is insufficient to cover twice
31 the average monthly tax liability, the commissioner may
32 require an additional surety bond from any licensee ifunder
33 one or more of the following circumstances:
34 (1) The commissioner determines that the surety on an
35 existing bond is unsatisfactory.;
36 (2) A surety notifies the department that it intends to
37 cancel a bond as provided in subsection (d).; or
38 (3) The commissioner, after reviewing the payment
39 history of the licensee, determines that the existing bond of
40 the licensee is insufficient in an amount to insure the prompt
41 payment of all excise taxes that are due or may become due to
42 the state by the licensee upon the sale or withdrawal of
43 compressed natural gas or liquefied natural gas. However, in
44 no case shall a new or additional bond be more than two months
45 of average excise tax owed by the licensee.
46 (c)(1) The department shall notify a licensee at his or
47 her last known address by first class U.S. mail or, at the
48 option of the department, certified mail, return receipt
49 requested, that it is requiring such new or additional bond
50 for any reason as provided abovein subsection(b), and the
51 licensee, within 3060 days from the date the notice is mailed
52 by the department, shall do either of the following:
53 a. File the new or additional bond as requested by the
54 department.; or
55 b. File a notice of appeal with the Alabama Tax
56 Tribunal as allowed in Chapter 2A.
Page 2

Tribunal as allowed in Chapter 2A.
SB86 Enrolled
57 (2) The department may immediately cancel the
58 licensee's license upon the expiration of the 3060-day period
59 set out abovein subdivision(1) if the licensee fails to either
60 provide the new or additional bond requested by the department
61 or timely appeal to the Alabama Tax Tribunal.
62 (d)(1) Any surety on an existing bond furnished by a
63 licensee may notify the department in writing of its intent to
64 cancel the bond. The department shall immediately notify the
65 licensee of the intent of the surety to cancel the surety
66 bond, and the licensee shall have 3060 days from the date the
67 notice is mailed by the department to provide a sufficient
68 replacement bond as requested by the department.
69 (2) The department may immediately cancel the
70 licensee's license upon expiration of the 3060-day period set
71 out abovein subdivision(1) if the licensee fails to either
72 provide a new replacement bond as requested by the department
73 or appeal the proposed revocation to the Alabama Tax Tribunal
74 within the 3060 days as allowed by Chapter 2A.
75 (3) The surety requesting to be released shall remain
76 liable for any liability already accrued or which shall accrue
77 during the 3060-day period set out abovein subdivision(1), but
78 shall not be responsible for any liability which accrues after
79 the 3060-day period.
80 (e) A surety providing a bond must be authorized to
81 engage in business within this state. The surety bonds are
82 conditioned upon faithful compliance with this article,
83 including the filing of returns and the payment of all tax
84 prescribed hereinin this article. The commissioner shall
Page 3

prescribed hereinin this article. The commissioner shall
SB86 Enrolled
85 approve surety bonds shall be approved by the commissioner as
86 to sufficiencythat are sufficient in content and form, and the
87 surety bonds shall indemnify the state against any loss
88 arising from the failure of the licensee to pay, for any
89 cause, the motor fuel excise tax levied by this article.
90 (f) A personal producer of CNG is not required to post
91 a bond."
92 "§40-17-335
93 (a) Upon approval of the application by the department,
94 the applicant shall file with the department a surety bond as
95 herein provided:.
96 (1) Except as provided under subdivision (3), theThe
97 bond amount for an applicant for a license as a supplier,
98 permissive supplier, or terminal operator shall be in the
99 approximate amount of twice the average monthly tax liability,
100 not to exceed two million dollars ($2,000,000), except as
101 provided under subdivision (3).
102 (2) Except as provided under subdivision (3), theThe
103 bond amount for an applicant for a license as an exporter,
104 blender, importer, or distributor shall be a minimum of two
105 thousand dollars ($2,000) or the approximate amount of twice
106 the average monthly tax liability, whichever is greater,
107 except as provided under subdivision (3).
108 (3) The bond for distributors, suppliers, and
109 permissive suppliers who are licensed with the department on
110 October 1, 2012, shall remain at the amount that is filed with
111 the department on that date, except as provided under
112 subsection (b).
Page 4

subsection (b).
SB86 Enrolled
113 (4) For an applicant for a license only as a motor fuel
114 transporter or aviation fuel purchaser, there shall be no
115 bond.
116 (5) Only one bond shall be required of an applicant for
117 multiple licenses. Except as provided under subdivision (3),
118 the bond amount shall be based on the highest average monthly
119 tax liability of the separate licenses, but shall cover all
120 licenses.
121 (b) The commissioner may require an additional surety
122 bond from any licensee if: (1)(i) the commissioner determines
123 that the surety on an existing bond is unsatisfactory; (2)(ii)
124 a surety notifies the department that it intends to cancel a
125 bond as provided in subsection (d); or (3)(iii) the
126 commissioner, after reviewing the financial condition of the
127 licensee, determines that the existing bond of the licensee is
128 insufficient in an amount to insure the prompt payment of all
129 excise taxes that are due or may become due the state by the
130 licensee upon the sale or withdrawal of motor fuel. However,
131 in no case shall a new or additional bond be more than two
132 months of average excise tax owed by the licensee.
133 (c) The department shall notify a licensee at his or
134 her last known address by first class U.S. mail or, at the
135 option of the department, certified mail, return receipt
136 requested, that itthe department is requiring sucha new or
137 additional bond for any reason as provided above, and the
138 licensee, within 3060 days from the date suchthe notice is
139 mailed by the department, shall either: (1)(i) file the new or
140 additional bond as requested by the department,; or (2)(ii)
Page 5

additional bond as requested by the department,; or (2)(ii)
SB86 Enrolled
141 file a notice of appeal with the Alabama Tax Tribunal as
142 allowed in Chapter 2B of this title. The department may
143 immediately cancel the licensee's license upon the expiration
144 of the 3060-day period set out above if the licensee fails to
145 either provide the new or additional bond requested by the
146 department or timely appeal to the Alabama Tax Tribunal.
147 (d) Any surety on an existing bond furnished by a
148 licensee may notify the department in writing of its intent to
149 cancel the bond. The department shall immediately notify the
150 licensee of the intent of the surety to cancel and the
151 licensee shall have 3060 days from the date the notice is
152 mailed by the department to provide a sufficient replacement
153 bond as requested by the department. The department may
154 immediately cancel the licensee's license upon expiration of
155 the 3060-day period set out above if the licensee fails to
156 either provide a new replacement bond as requested by the
157 department or appeal the proposed revocation to the Alabama
158 Tax Tribunal within the 3060 days as allowed by Chapter 2B of
159 this title. The surety requesting to be released shall remain
160 liable for any liability already accrued or which shall accrue
161 during the 3060-day period set out above, but shall not be
162 responsible for any liability which accrues after the 3060-day
163 period.
164 (e) A surety providing a bond must be authorized to
165 engage in business within this state. The surety bonds are
166 conditioned upon faithful compliance with the provisions of
167 this article, including the filing of returns and the payment
168 of all tax prescribed hereinin this article. The commissioner
Page 6

of all tax prescribed hereinin this article. The commissioner
SB86 Enrolled
169 shall approve surety bonds shall be approved by the
170 commissioner as to sufficiencythat are sufficient in content
171 and form, and the surety bonds shall indemnify the state
172 against any loss arising from the failure of the licensee to
173 pay, for any cause, the motor fuel excise tax levied by this
174 article and Article 12A, Chapter 17 of this title."
175 "§40-17-353
176 (a) Upon the discovery of any motor fuel illegally
177 imported into or illegally transported, delivered, stored, or
178 sold in this state, the commissioner shall order the tank or
179 other storage receptacle in which the motor fuel is located to
180 be seized and locked or sealed until the tax, interest, and
181 penalties levied under this article are assessed and paid.
182 (b) If the assessment for the above tax described in
183 subsection(a) is not paid within 3060 days, the commissioner,
184 in addition to the other remedies in this article, may sell
185 the motor fuel and use the proceeds of the sale to satisfy the
186 assessment due, with any excess funds after payment of the
187 assessment and costs of the sale being returned to the owner
188 of the motor fuel.
189 (c) All motor fuel and any property, tangible or
190 intangible, which is found upon the person or in any vehicle
191 which the person is using, including the vehicle itself, to
192 transport or sell illegally transported, delivered, stored,
193 sold, imported, or acquired motor fuel, and any property found
194 in the immediate vicinity, including motor vehicles, tanks,
195 and other storage devices, used to aid in the illegal
196 transportation or sale of motor fuel, shall be considered
Page 7

transportation or sale of motor fuel, shall be considered
SB86 Enrolled
197 contraband and shall be forfeited to this state."
198 Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 8

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
SB86 Enrolled
199
200
201
202
203
204
205 ________________________________________________
206 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
207
208
209
210 ________________________________________________
211 Speaker of the House of Representatives
212
213
214 SB86
215 Senate 05-Feb-26
216 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
217 the Senate.
218
219 Patrick Harris,
220 Secretary.
221
222
223
224
225 House of Representatives
226 Passed: 07-Apr-26
227
228
229
230
231 By: Senator Carnley
Page 9